Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature intends to remember Washington service members who died in Operation Iraqi Freedom, Operation Enduring Freedom, and Operation New Dawn, which are classified under the umbrella term global war on terror.Following the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, many Washington residents answered the call to serve their country in the global war on terror. They chose duty and sacrifice, serving in the nation's all-volunteer military to prevent such a devastating attack on America from happening again.Operation Enduring Freedom began on October 7, 2001, when the United States initiated military operations in Afghanistan. Combat operations there concluded on December 31, 2014.Operation Iraqi Freedom began on March 20, 2003. Although President Bush declared an end to major combat operations on May 1, 2003, prolonged insurgency and sectarian violence persisted. United States forces continued peacekeeping efforts and supported the new Iraqi government under Operation New Dawn until their withdrawal on December 15, 2011.Although military operations in the global war on terror ended in 2014, there is no memorial on the state capitol campus to specifically honor Washington residents who died in these operations.The legislature intends to establish a dedicated memorial on the global war on terror. This memorial will continue Washington's tradition of recognizing residents who made the ultimate sacrifice to defend the homeland and promote peace worldwide.Sec. 2. RCW 43.34.100 and 2022 c 191 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:((Any))(1) The global war on terror memorial is established on the capitol campus to commemorate the global war on terror ((must))to recognize service members who died in Operation Iraqi Freedom, Operation Enduring Freedom, and Operation New Dawn, which are classified under the umbrella term global war on terror. ((Any such))The memorial must include a component designed to reflect on the great number of active duty service members and veterans who have died by suicide after serving in these wars. The design of ((such a))the memorial must serve to honor those who are lost and provide a sacred space for healing and reflection for veterans and military families.(2) The capitol committee, or any subcommittee within, must consult with the department of enterprise services and the global war on terror memorial work group in its planning, construction, and placement of the memorial.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.34 RCW to read as follows:(1) The global war on terror memorial work group is established to study and make recommendations on a memorial on the capitol campus to honor service members who died in the global war on terror.(2) The global war on terror memorial work group consists of:(a) The secretary of state, or the secretary's designee;(b) Two members from the house of representatives, one appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one appointed by the house minority leader;(c) Two members from the senate, one appointed by the senate majority leader and one appointed by the senate minority leader;(d) The director of the department of veterans affairs, or the director's designee;(e) The director of the Washington state parks and recreation commission, or the director's designee;(f) The director of the department of enterprise services, or the director's designee;(g) The director of the Washington state military department, or the director's designee;(h) The state archivist, or the state archivist's designee;(i) A representative of the capitol campus design advisory committee who is not the secretary of state or a legislative member already appointed to the work group; and(j) Two representatives from veterans' organizations, appointed by the secretary of state.(3) The global war on terror memorial work group must convene its initial meeting before July 15, 2026, and must meet at least quarterly thereafter. At its initial meeting, the members shall select two cochairs from among its membership.(4) The global war on terror memorial work group must provide the capitol committee with a report detailing:(a) Recommended names of individuals to be honored at the memorial;(b) Recommended locations on the capitol campus where the memorial could be constructed and include any permit requirements or other restrictions that may exist for each location;(c) Recommendations for a sculptor to design and carve or cast the memorial;(d) Potential draft designs for the memorial;(e) Recommended funding sources to carry out the purposes of this section; and(f) A proposed budget to fully cover the costs for:(i) The design, construction, transportation, and placement of the memorial;(ii) Any required permits;(iii) Anticipated ongoing maintenance costs passed on potential materials used and historical maintenance of other memorials on the capitol campus;(iv) A ceremony to celebrate the unveiling of the memorial; and(v) Other expenses that may be necessary for the planning, construction, and placement of the memorial.(5) The capitol committee shall begin the selection and contracting process with a sculptor recommended by the work group within 30 days of receiving sufficient funds to fully cover costs described under subsection (4)(f) of this section. The capitol committee must provide written notice to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others deemed appropriate by the capitol committee upon receiving sufficient funds to fully cover costs described under subsection (4)(f) of this section.(6) The capitol committee is encouraged to complete the planning, construction, and placement of the memorial within five years of the condition under subsection (5) of this section being met. The global war on terror memorial work group shall arrange for a ceremony to celebrate the unveiling of the memorial.(7) The global war on terror memorial work group may:(a) Perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes of this section; and(b) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public and private sources that are made in trust or otherwise for the use and benefit of the purposes of the committee in carrying out this section. The committee may spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from public or private sources according to their terms. All receipts from gifts, grants, and endowments received under this subsection must be deposited in the Washington state global war on terror memorial account established in RCW 43.34.105.(8) Staff support for the work group must be provided by the office of the secretary of state.(9) Members of the work group shall receive no compensation for their service as members of the work group. However, legislative members of the work group may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those who are participating on behalf of an employer, governmental entity, or other organization, may be reimbursed for travel and other expenses in accordance with chapter 43.03 RCW.(10) This section expires after the unveiling of the global war on terror memorial. The secretary of state shall notify affected parties, the governor, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others deemed appropriate of the date when the unveiling ceremony is completed.--- END ---